Maine, session 132, LD960.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 18-C MRSA §5-312, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 463, §1, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
For purposes of this paragraph, the delay of discharge of a patient in a hospital until
the appointment of a guardian constitutes substantial harm. Identification of a
placement in a nursing facility or residential care facility for a patient delayed from
discharge from a hospital is not required to file a petition for emergency guardianship
under this section;
Sec. 2. Nursing facility location requirement. The Department of Health and
Human Services shall amend its rules in Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter
II, Section 67, Nursing Facility Services, to remove the requirement for a placement to be
within a 60-mile radius from a MaineCare member's home when the member is being
discharged from a hospital to a nursing facility placement.
Sec. 3. MaineCare application processing standard. The Department of
Health and Human Services shall amend its rules in Chapter 332: MaineCare Eligibility
Manual to establish a 30-day processing standard for MaineCare applications for
hospitalized patients in need of MaineCare approval for nursing facility placement.